Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.401

Appeal—Transcript—Cost.

The director shall prepare at appellant's expense and shall certify a transcript of the whole record of all matters involved in the appeal, which the director shall deliver to the court in which the appeal is pending. The appellant is notified of the filing of the transcript and the cost thereof and shall within fifteen days thereafter pay the cost of said transcript. If the cost is not paid in full within fifteen days the appeal is dismissed.

[ 2008 c 23 s 36; 1997 c 322 s 18; 1951 c 222 s 26. Formerly RCW 18.85.281.]